New York, session 2025-2026, A8450.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new article 32-A to 2 read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 32-A 4 RADON MEASUREMENT AND RADON MITIGATION LICENSES 5 Section 949. Definitions. 6 949-a. Prohibition against conduct of radon measurement or radon 7 mitigation without a license. 8 949-b. Licensure of a radon measurement professional. 9 949-c. Licensure of radon mitigation professional. 10 949-d. Licensure of radon business entities. 11 949-e. Liability insurance policy requirement. 12 949-f. Duties of licensees; lapse; report changes. 13 949-g. Power of the department to examine and inspect. 14 949-h. Civil penalties and revocation. 15 949-i. Location and retention of required records. 16 949-j. Responsibilities and authority of the department. 17 § 949. Definitions. As used in this article, unless the context 18 requires otherwise: 19 1. "Alter" means to change or modify a building or building design or 20 to revise a mitigation system or mitigation system design. 21 2. "Building" means any structure used or intended to be used for 22 supporting or sheltering any use or occupancy. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00473-04-5 A. 8450 2 1 3. "Certified" means meeting the requirements of a certification 2 program recognized by the department for radon measurement or radon 3 mitigation. 4 4. "Compensation" means something of value given or received in 5 exchange for radon measurement or radon mitigation. 6 5. "Credentialing body" means a provider who is recognized by the 7 environmental protection agency as an entity that can provide radon 8 certification to qualified persons. 9 6. "Direct supervision" means onsite supervision by a person certified 10 to provide radon measurement or radon mitigation services. 11 7. "Government agency" means the state, a state agency, a political 12 subdivision, or any entity of local government. 13 8. "Laboratory analysis" means the act of analyzing for radon or radon 14 progeny concentrations with passive measurement devices or analyzing 15 data from a continuous radon monitor or electrets; "laboratory analysis" 16 also means the act of calibrating radon or radon progeny measurement 17 devices or the act of exposing radon or radon progeny devices to 18 controlled concentrations of radon or radon progeny. 19 9. "Measurement" means the act of testing the air or potable water for 20 the presence of radon or radon progeny in the indoor environment of a 21 building using an active or passive measurement device. 22 10. "Measurement device" means any active or passive device approved 23 by a certification or proficiency program and used for the measurement 24 of radon or radon progeny in air or potable water in the indoor environ- 25 ment of a building. 26 11. "Measurement professional" means a person certified by a creden- 27 tialing program recognized by the department who provides radon measure- 28 ment for compensation and who meets the requirements of section nine 29 hundred forty-nine-b of this article. 30 12. "Mitigation" means the act of installing, repairing, or altering 31 an active or passive system for the purpose, in whole or in part, of 32 reducing the concentration of radon or radon progeny in the indoor envi- 33 ronment of a building. 34 13. "Mitigation professional" means a person certified by a creden- 35 tialing program recognized by the department who provides radon miti- 36 gation for compensation and who meets the requirements of section nine 37 hundred forty-nine-c of this article. 38 14. "Mitigation system" means any active or passive system designed to 39 reduce radon concentrations in the indoor environment of a building. 40 15. "Passive radon measurement device" means a detector that collects 41 a time-weighted average and does not provide hourly readings, including 42 activated charcoal kits, liquid scintillation vials, and alpha-track 43 detectors. 44 16. "Radon" means a naturally occurring radioactive element that 45 exists as a colorless, odorless, and tasteless inert gas. 46 17. "Radon laboratory" means an entity certified by the department of 47 health's environmental laboratory approval program to measure radon and 48 radon progeny in air and potable water. 49 18. "Radon progeny" means any combination of the radioactive decay 50 products of radon. 51 19. "Licensee" means a person or business entity licensed by the 52 department as a radon measurement professional or radon mitigation 53 professional. 54 20. "Standard" means a current written document developed and contin- 55 uously maintained according to the requirements of the American National 56 Standards Institute (ANSI) or by a standards development organization A. 8450 3 1 accredited by the ANSI that describes in detail commonly accepted meth- 2 ods for the performance of certain tasks. 3 § 949-a. Prohibition against conduct of radon measurement or radon 4 mitigation without a license. 1. No person or business entity shall 5 conduct radon measurement or mitigation in this state without a valid 6 radon measurement professional license or radon mitigation professional 7 license pursuant to this article. No person or business entity shall 8 advertise or claim to be a radon measurement professional or a radon 9 mitigation professional unless such person or business entity is 10 licensed pursuant to this article. 11 2. A business entity may engage in radon measurement or radon miti- 12 gation if the owner or an employee associated with the business entity 13 is a radon measurement or radon mitigation professional, as applicable, 14 and performs or supervises the work as applicable. Any business entity 15 that employs persons to perform radon measurement or radon mitigation 16 shall have a business entity license. 17 3. The licensure requirements of this article shall apply to radon 18 measurement professionals, radon measurement business entities, radon 19 mitigation professionals and radon mitigation business entities; 20 provided, however, that such licensure requirements shall not apply to: 21 (a) a person performing radon measurement or radon mitigation on a 22 single-family residential building that such person owns and occupies or 23 on a rental property that such person occupies; 24 (b) a home inspector licensed in New York state conducting radon test- 25 ing on a single-family and duplex home using passive radon measurement 26 devices in conjunction with a home inspection; 27 (c) a person performing radon measurement who assists and is under the 28 direct supervision of a radon measurement professional; 29 (d) a person performing radon mitigation who assists and is under the 30 direct supervision of a mitigation professional; or 31 (e) an agent of a federal, state, or local government agency acting 32 within such agent's official capacity. 33 § 949-b. Licensure of a radon measurement professional. 1. The depart- 34 ment shall issue a radon measurement professional license to any person 35 certified to measure radon who: 36 (a) Completes an application and pays a fee as prescribed by the 37 department; 38 (b) Presents current proof of certification to measure radon issued by 39 a credentialing body approved by the department; and 40 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 41 satisfies the requirements of this article. 42 2. The department shall renew the radon measurement professional 43 license of any person who: 44 (a) Completes a renewal application and pays a fee as prescribed by 45 the department; 46 (b) Presents current proof of certification to measure radon issued by 47 a credentialing body acceptable to the department; and 48 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 49 satisfies the requirements of this article. 50 3. A radon measurement professional shall: 51 (a) Maintain certification to measure radon by a credentialing body 52 approved by the department; 53 (b) Ensure that all radon measurements are conducted in accordance 54 with the applicable radon measurement standard; 55 (c) Maintain a quality assurance plan in accordance with the standard 56 for radon measurement systems quality assurance; A. 8450 4 1 (d) Ensure that all radon measurements are conducted by or under the 2 direct supervision of a radon measurement professional; 3 (e) Only use or sell radon measurement devices approved by the creden- 4 tialing body that issued the radon measurement certification to the 5 radon measurement professional; 6 (f) Report all radon measurements in the manner prescribed by the 7 department of health; and 8 (g) Ensure that all sample analysis is conducted by a radon laboratory 9 approved by the department of health environmental laboratory approval 10 program. 11 § 949-c. Licensure of radon mitigation professional. 1. The department 12 shall issue a radon mitigation professional license to any person certi- 13 fied to perform radon mitigation who: 14 (a) Completes an application and pays a fee as prescribed by the 15 department; 16 (b) Presents current proof of certification to mitigate radon issued 17 by a credentialing body approved by the department; and 18 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 19 satisfies the requirements of this article. 20 2. The department shall renew the radon mitigation professional 21 license of any person who: 22 (a) Completes a renewal application and pays a fee as prescribed by 23 the department; 24 (b) Presents current proof of certification to mitigate radon issued 25 by a credentialing body approved by the department; and 26 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 27 satisfies the requirements of this article. 28 3. A radon mitigation professional shall: 29 (a) Maintain certification to mitigate radon issued by a credentialing 30 body approved by the department; 31 (b) Ensure that all radon mitigation is conducted in accordance with 32 the applicable radon mitigation standard; 33 (c) Maintain a quality management plan in accordance with the applica- 34 ble standard for radon mitigation quality assurance; 35 (d) Ensure that all radon mitigation is conducted by or under the 36 direct supervision of a radon mitigation professional; 37 (e) Report all radon mitigation in the manner prescribed by the 38 department of health; and 39 (f) Ensure that all radon mitigation systems repaired or altered by a 40 radon mitigation professional meet the applicable radon mitigation stan- 41 dard and are tested by a radon measurement professional within thirty 42 days of such repair or alteration. 43 § 949-d. Licensure of radon business entities. 1. The department shall 44 issue a radon business entity license to any business entity that: 45 (a) Completes an application and pays a fee as prescribed by the 46 department; 47 (b) Designates a responsible person certified to perform radon meas- 48 urement or radon mitigation by a credentialing body approved by the 49 department; and 50 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 51 satisfies the requirements of this article. 52 2. The department shall renew the radon business entity license of any 53 business entity that: 54 (a) Completes a renewal application and pays a fee as prescribed by 55 the department; A. 8450 5 1 (b) Designates a responsible person certified to perform radon meas- 2 urement or radon mitigation by a credentialing body approved by the 3 department; and 4 (c) Furnishes evidence of a general liability insurance policy that 5 satisfies the requirements of this article. 6 § 949-e. Liability insurance policy requirement. 1. Each radon meas- 7 urement professional, radon measurement business entity, radon miti- 8 gation professional and radon mitigation business entity shall maintain 9 an insurance policy in effect at all times and concurrent with the 10 licensure and certification period that: 11 (a) Is issued by an insurance company or other legal entity permitted 12 to transact insurance business in the state; 13 (b) Provides for general liability coverage for radon measurement 14 professionals, radon measurement business entities, radon mitigation 15 professionals, radon mitigation business entities or radon laboratories, 16 as applicable, in an amount specified by the department; and 17 (c) Lists the department as a certificate holder of any insurance 18 policy issued pursuant to this article. 19 2. A liability insurance policy obtained pursuant to this section 20 shall not be cancelled, revoked, or terminated by the owner, nor shall 21 the owner take action that would result in the cancellation, revocation, 22 or termination of such insurance policy, except after notice to the 23 department at least forty-five days in advance of such cancellation, 24 revocation, or termination which is submitted on a form prescribed by 25 the department. 26 § 949-f. Duties of licensees; lapse; report changes. 1. A license that 27 is not renewed by the expiration date of such license shall be deemed to 28 be lapsed and shall only be reinstated upon the completion of a renewal 29 application process as prescribed by the department. 30 2. A licensee shall report any change of information pertaining to an 31 existing license relating to information that was submitted during the 32 application process for such license. Such report shall be made to the 33 department in writing and within ten days of such change taking place. 34 The department shall not be responsible for the failure of a licensee to 35 receive notices, communications, or other correspondence caused by a 36 failure of the licensee to report changes as required by this subdivi- 37 sion. 38 § 949-g. Power of the department to examine and inspect. 1. The 39 department or its agent or inspector may examine records of radon meas- 40 urement professionals, radon measurement business entities, radon miti- 41 gation professionals, and radon mitigation business entities, including 42 but not limited to conducting inspections of radon measurement locations 43 and radon mitigation system installations in order to ensure that radon 44 measurement and radon mitigation are conducted in accordance with the 45 applicable standard. 46 2. The department or its agent or inspector may inspect any equipment 47 used for radon measurement or radon mitigation or photograph or sketch 48 any portion of a site, building, or equipment involved in radon measure- 49 ment or radon mitigation. 50 3. The department shall obtain permission from the property owner 51 before agents or inspectors of the department enter private property to 52 perform a radon measurement or radon mitigation inspection. 53 4. No person shall interfere with a radon measurement or radon miti- 54 gation inspection conducted by an agent or inspector of the department. 55 § 949-h. Civil penalties and revocation. 1. The commissioner may, 56 after providing notice and a hearing, suspend or revoke any license, or A. 8450 6 1 censure, fine, or impose probationary or other restrictions on any 2 licensee for good cause shown which shall include, but not be limited to 3 the following: 4 (a) conviction of a felony relating to the performance of a radon 5 measurement or radon mitigation; 6 (b) deceit or misrepresentation in obtaining a license authorized 7 pursuant to this article; 8 (c) providing false testimony or documents to the department in 9 relation to a license authorized pursuant to this article or any other 10 license issued by the department; 11 (d) deceiving or defrauding the public in relation to services 12 provided for a fee that require a license pursuant to this article; or 13 (e) incompetence or gross negligence in relation to radon measurement 14 or radon mitigation. 15 2. Violators of any of the provisions of this article may be fined by 16 the commissioner in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars for the 17 initial violation and up to ten thousand dollars for each subsequent 18 violation. 19 § 949-i. Location and retention of required records. 1. Records 20 required by this article or administrative regulations promulgated 21 pursuant to this article or the applicable standard, including but not 22 limited to records of radon measurement, radon mitigation, quality 23 assurance plans, quality management plans, calibration certifications, 24 worker health and safety plans, and equipment repairs shall be retained 25 by licensees, as applicable, for a minimum period of five years or the 26 length of time of any warranty or guarantee, whichever is greater. 27 2. Records obtained by the department shall be exempt from disclosure 28 requirements; provided, however, that the department shall make radon 29 measurement and radon mitigation system records available upon request 30 to: 31 (a) The owner or occupant of a building; 32 (b) The public, provided that such records are aggregated at the zip 33 code level without identifying individual property owners or addresses; 34 and 35 (c) A federal agency that provides aggregated data to the public. 36 3. Any radon measurement or radon mitigation professional or business 37 entity applying for a license or license renewal pursuant to this arti- 38 cle shall specify, for approval by the department, the physical or elec- 39 tronic location where records required under this article shall be main- 40 tained for inspection by the department. 41 § 949-j. Responsibilities and authority of the department. 1. The 42 department shall be the regulatory agency for the regulation of radon 43 testing and radon mitigating firms and licensed individuals. 44 2. The department shall: 45 (a) Promulgate rules and regulations to administer, coordinate, and 46 enforce this article, including the establishment of fees; 47 (b) Maintain a public list of all persons and business entities 48 licensed by the department; 49 (c) Issue a license to persons and business entities that meet the 50 qualifications of this article; 51 (d) Appoint personnel to perform duties to administer this article and 52 fix the compensation of such personnel; 53 (e) Issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses, investigate 54 allegations of wrongdoing, and conduct administrative hearings to 55 enforce this article; and A. 8450 7 1 (f) Collect or receive all fees, fines, and other moneys owed pursuant 2 to this article. 3 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-ss to 4 read as follows: 5 § 99-ss. Radon mitigation and control fund. 1. There is hereby estab- 6 lished in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the commission- 7 er of taxation and finance, a fund to be known as the radon mitigation 8 and control fund. 9 2. Such fund shall consist of all monies collected pursuant to article 10 thirty-two-A of the labor law, and all other monies credited or trans- 11 ferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law. 12 3. Monies of the fund shall be expended solely for the purposes of 13 carrying out the provisions of article thirty-two-A of the labor law. 14 Monies shall be paid out of the fund on the audit and warrant of the 15 state comptroller on vouchers approved by the commissioner of labor. Any 16 interest received by the comptroller on monies on deposit in the radon 17 mitigation and control fund shall be retained in and become part of such 18 fund. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 20 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.